Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4527.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1a. As used in this act:
(a) "Blind" means a person an individual who has a visual
acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye with correction, or has
limitation of his or her the individual's field of vision such that
the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angular
LEP H01723'25 (H-1) 2ekhut


distance not greater than 20 degrees.
(b) "Cane" means an aid used by a blind pedestrian for travel
and identification purposes that is predominantly white or metallic
in color with or without a red tip.
(c) "Crosswalk" means that term as defined in section 10 of
the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.10.
(d) "Dog guide" means a dog, in harness, that has been
formally trained and that is used by a blind person as a travel
aid."Service animal" means that term as defined in section 50a of
the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50a.
(e) "Walker" means an aid used by a blind pedestrian for
travel and identification purposes that is white in color or has
white legs with or without a red tip.
Sec. 2. (1) A driver of a vehicle shall not approach a
crosswalk or any other pedestrian crossing without taking all
necessary precautions to avoid accident or injury to a blind
pedestrian carrying a cane or using a dog guide service animal or
walker.
(2) A driver who approaches a crosswalk or any other
pedestrian crossing without taking all necessary precautions to
avoid accident or injury to a blind pedestrian carrying a cane or
using a dog guide service animal or walker is liable in damages for
any injuries caused to the blind pedestrian. A blind pedestrian who
does not carry a cane or use a dog guide service animal or walker
has all of the rights and privileges conferred upon any other
pedestrian by the laws of this state. The failure of a blind
pedestrian to carry a cane or use a dog guide service animal or
walker shall must not be treated as evidence of negligence in a
civil action for injury to the blind pedestrian or for the blind
LEP H01723'25 (H-1) 2ekhut


pedestrian's wrongful death. A driver who approaches a crosswalk or
any other pedestrian crossing without taking all necessary
precautions to avoid accident or injury to a blind pedestrian
carrying a cane or using a service animal or walker is subject to
criminal penalties as provided under section 3.
(3) If a person alleges to a peace officer a violation of
subsection (1), the peace officer shall investigate the alleged
violation. The prosecuting attorney shall review the peace
officer's investigative report to determine whether a violation of
subsection (1) has occurred and whether to issue charges. Upon the
request of the blind pedestrian and after reviewing the
investigative report, a prosecuting attorney shall inform the blind
pedestrian of his or her the prosecuting attorney's decision and
the reason or reasons supporting that decision.
Sec. 3. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2),
(3), and (4), a person who that violates section 2(1) is guilty of
a misdemeanor , punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90
days, or by a fine of not more less than $100.00 and not more than
$500.00, or both.
(2) A person that violates section 2(1) in a grossly negligent
manner causing injury to a blind pedestrian, or the blind
pedestrian's service animal, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than
$1,000.00, or both.
(3) A person that violates section 2(1) in a grossly negligent
manner causing the death of a blind pedestrian is guilty of a
felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, a
fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both.
(4) A person that violates section 2(1) in a grossly negligent
LEP H01723'25 (H-1) 2ekhut


manner causing the death of a blind pedestrian's service animal is
guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5
years, a fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both.
Final Page
LEP H01723'25 (H-1) 2ekhut